Utah statutes.
58-40a-301.   Licensure required.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of athletic training, except as specifically provided in Section 58-1-307 or 58-40a-305.

(2)  The division shall issue to an individual who qualifies under this chapter a license in the classification of athletic trainer.

(3)  An individual may not use the title "licensed athletic trainer," or "athletic trainer," or abbreviations or insignias to imply that the individual is an athletic trainer unless the individual is licensed under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 206, 2006 General Session

